Nevada, session 83, AB349.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 287 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act, unless
the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in
sections 3 and 4 of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in
those sections.
Sec. 3. “Division” means the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy of the Department of Health and Human
Services.
-
*AB349*

– 3 –
Sec. 4. “Health care facility” means:
1. A hospital, as defined in NRS 449.012, other than a
hospital which has been certified as a critical access hospital by
the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1395i-4(e).
2. An independent center for emergency medical care, as
defined in NRS 449.013.
3. A surgical center for ambulatory patients, as defined in
NRS 449.019.
Sec. 5. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
except for subsection 3 to the contrary, any contract for goods and
services between the Board or an opt-in local government and a
health care facility must establish a rate of reimbursement for
inpatient and outpatient services provided by an in-network facility
that does not exceed the lesser of:
(a) The billed charge for the service;
(b) The rate of reimbursement prescribed for the services in a
contract between the Board or the opt-in local government, as
applicable, and the health care facility for the 2024 plan year; or
(c) One hundred and seventy-five percent of the rate of
reimbursement provided by Medicare for the same or similar
services on the date on which the service is provided.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law except for
subsection 3 to the contrary, an out-of-network facility shall not
charge the Program or an opt-in local government an amount for
inpatient or outpatient services provided by the health care facility
that exceed the lesser of:
(a) The billed charge for the service;
(b) The rate of reimbursement prescribed for the services in a
contract between the Board or the opt-in local government, as
applicable, and the health care facility for the 2024 plan year; or
(c) One hundred and sixty percent of the rate of
reimbursement provided by Medicare for the same or similar
services on the date on which the service is provided.
3. The Division, with the approval of the Interim Finance
Committee, may increase the maximum rates of reimbursement
prescribed by subsections 1 and 2 if the Division determines that
health care facilities in this State are experiencing financial
hardship due to a decrease in the rates of reimbursement provided
under Medicaid.
4. Nothing in this section prohibits the Board or an opt-in
local government from reimbursing a health care facility through
a payment model other than fee-for-service as long as:
(a) The payments incentivize higher quality or improved health
outcomes; and
-
*AB349*

– 4 –
(b) The rates of reimbursement paid under the payment model
comply with the requirements of this section.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “In-network facility” means a health care facility that has
entered into a contract with the Program or an opt-in local
government to provide care to persons covered by the Program or
opt-in local government.
(b) “Opt-in local government” means a governing body of a
county, school district, municipal corporation, political
subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada that provides health coverage
pursuant to NRS 287.010 or any issuer of a policy of health
insurance purchased pursuant to NRS 287.010 that elects
pursuant to NRS 287.012 to pay the rates prescribed by this
section to health care facilities.
(c) “Out-of-network facility” means a health care facility that
has not entered into a contract with the Program or an opt-in local
government to provide care to persons covered by the Program or
opt-in local government.
Sec. 6. On or before July 30 of each even-numbered year,
the Division shall:
1. Review and study the impacts of the provisions of section 5
of this act;
2. Compile a report with a summary of such information and
any recommendations relating to the provisions of section 5 of this
act; and
3. Submit the report compiled pursuant to subsection 2 to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human
Services.
Sec. 7. The Division shall adopt any regulations necessary to
carry out the provisions of sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act,
including, without limitation, regulations prescribing civil
penalties that may be imposed against a health care facility that
charges a rate that exceeds the maximum amounts prescribed by
section 5 of this act for services to which the provisions of that
section apply.
Sec. 8. 1. The Division may report any failure by a health
care facility to comply with the provisions of sections 2 to 8,
inclusive, of this act to the Division of Public and Behavioral
Health of the Department of Health and Human Services for the
initiation of disciplinary proceedings.
2. The Division or the Attorney General may maintain in any
court of competent jurisdiction a suit to enjoin any person from
charging rates that exceed the maximum amounts prescribed by
-
*AB349*

– 5 –
section 5 of this act for services to which the provisions of that
section apply. Such an injunction:
(a) May be issued without proof of actual damage sustained by
any person as a preventive or punitive measure.
(b) Does not relieve any person or business entity from any
other legal action.
3. Any person or entity injured by the failure of a health care
facility to charge rates in accordance with the provisions of section
5 of this act for services to which that section applies may
maintain in any court of competent jurisdiction a suit to recover:
(a) Damages resulting from such failure; and
(b) Attorney’s fees and costs.
Sec. 9. NRS 287.012 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.012 1. A governing body of a county, school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada that
provides coverage of prescription drugs pursuant to NRS 287.010 or
any issuer of a policy of health insurance purchased pursuant to
NRS 287.010 may use the list of preferred prescription drugs
developed by the Department of Health and Human Services
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 422.4025 as its formulary and
obtain prescription drugs through the purchasing agreements
negotiated by the Department pursuant to that section by notifying
the Department in the form prescribed by the Department.
2. A governing body of a county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other
local governmental agency of the State of Nevada that provides
health coverage pursuant to NRS 287.010 or any issuer of a policy
of health insurance purchased pursuant to NRS 287.010 may elect
to pay rates established by section 5 of this act to health care
facilities for goods and services described in that section by
notifying the Division of Health Care Financing and Policy of the
Department in the form prescribed by the Department.
3. As used in this section, “health care facility” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 10. NRS 287.0402 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.0402 As used in NRS 287.0402 to 287.049, inclusive, and
sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 287.0404 to
287.04064, inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 11. NRS 218E.405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.405 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the Interim Finance Committee may exercise the powers conferred
-
*AB349*

– 6 –
upon it by law only when the Legislature is not in a regular or
special session.
2. During a regular or special session, the Interim Finance
Committee may also perform the duties imposed on it by NRS
228.1111, subsection 5 of NRS 284.115, NRS 285.070, subsection 2
of NRS 321.335, NRS 322.007, subsection 2 of NRS 323.020, NRS
323.050, subsection 1 of NRS 323.100, subsection 3 of
NRS 341.126, NRS 341.142, paragraph (f) of subsection 1 of NRS
341.145, subsection 3 of NRS 349.073, NRS 353.220, 353.224,
353.2705 to 353.2771, inclusive, 353.288, 353.335, 353.3375,
353C.224, 353C.226, paragraph (b) of subsection 4 of NRS
407.0762, NRS 428.375, 433.732, 439.4905, 439.620, 439.630,
445B.830, subsection 1 of NRS 445C.320 and NRS 538.650 [.] and
section 5 of this act. In performing those duties, the Senate Standing
Committee on Finance and the Assembly Standing Committee on
Ways and Means may meet separately and transmit the results of
their respective votes to the Chair of the Interim Finance Committee
to determine the action of the Interim Finance Committee as a
whole.
3. The Chair of the Interim Finance Committee may appoint a
subcommittee consisting of six members of the Committee to
review and make recommendations to the Committee on matters of
the State Public Works Division of the Department of
Administration that require prior approval of the Interim Finance
Committee pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 341.126, NRS 341.142
and paragraph (f) of subsection 1 of NRS 341.145. If the Chair
appoints such a subcommittee:
(a) The Chair shall designate one of the members of the
subcommittee to serve as the chair of the subcommittee;
(b) The subcommittee shall meet throughout the year at the
times and places specified by the call of the chair of the
subcommittee; and
(c) The Director or the Director’s designee shall act as the
nonvoting recording secretary of the subcommittee.
Sec. 12. NRS 439B.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439B.400 1. Each hospital in this State shall [maintain] :
(a) Maintain and use a uniform list of billed charges for that
hospital for units of service or goods provided to all inpatients. A
hospital may not use a billed charge for an inpatient that is different
than the billed charge used for another inpatient for the same service
or goods provided. This section does not restrict the ability of a
hospital or other person to negotiate a discounted rate from the
hospital’s billed charges or to contract for a different rate or
mechanism for payment of the hospital.
-
*AB349*

– 7 –
(b) Comply with the provisions of 45 C.F.R. §§ 180.40, 180.50
and 180.60 regarding the publication of:
(1) A list of standard charges for all items and services; and
(2) A consumer-friendly list of standard charges for a
limited set of shoppable services.
(c) On or before February 1 of each year, provide the
Department the most current version of each list described in
paragraph (b).
2. If an allegation of a violation of the provisions of
subsection 1 is made against a hospital, the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health of the Department shall conduct an
investigation of the alleged violation. Such a violation constitutes
grounds for the denial, suspension or revocation of such a license,
or for the imposition of any sanction prescribed by NRS 449.163.
Sec. 13. NRS 439B.742 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439B.742 The provisions of NRS 439B.745 and 439B.748 do
not apply to:
1. A hospital which has been certified as a critical access
hospital by the Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant to
42 U.S.C. § 1395i-4(e) or any medically necessary emergency
services provided at such a hospital;
2. A person who is covered by a policy of health insurance that
was sold outside this State; [or]
3. Any health care services provided more than 24 hours after
notification is provided pursuant to NRS 439B.745 that a person has
been stabilized [.] ; or
4. Any goods or services for which maximum rates have been
established by section 8 of this act.
Sec. 14. NRS 449.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.160 1. The Division may deny an application for a
license or may suspend or revoke any license issued under the
provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, upon any of the
following grounds:
(a) Violation by the applicant or the licensee of any of the
provisions of NRS 439B.400, 439B.410, 449.029 to 449.245,
inclusive, or 449A.100 to 449A.124, inclusive, and 449A.270 to
449A.286, inclusive, or of any other law of this State or of the
standards, rules and regulations adopted thereunder.
(b) Aiding, abetting or permitting the commission of any illegal
act.
(c) Conduct inimical to the public health, morals, welfare and
safety of the people of the State of Nevada in the maintenance and
operation of the premises for which a license is issued.
(d) Conduct or practice detrimental to the health or safety of the
occupants or employees of the facility.
-
*AB349*

– 8 –
(e) Failure of the applicant to obtain written approval from the
Director of the Department of Health and Human Services as
required by NRS 439A.100 or 439A.102 or as provided in any
regulation adopted pursuant to NRS 449.001 to 449.430, inclusive,
and 449.435 to 449.531, inclusive, and chapter 449A of NRS if such
approval is required, including, without limitation, the closure or
conversion of any hospital in a county whose population is 100,000
or more that is owned by the licensee without approval pursuant to
NRS 439A.102.
(f) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 441A.315 and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto or NRS 449.2486.
(g) Violation of the provisions of NRS 458.112.
(h) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 449A.170 to
449A.192, inclusive, and any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.
(i) Violation of the provisions of NRS 629.260.
(j) Failure to comply with the provisions of sections 2 to 8,
inclusive, of this act or any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
2. In addition to the provisions of subsection 1, the Division
may revoke a license to operate a facility for the dependent if, with
respect to that facility, the licensee that operates the facility, or an
agent or employee of the licensee:
(a) Is convicted of violating any of the provisions of
NRS 202.470;
(b) Is ordered to but fails to abate a nuisance pursuant to NRS
244.360, 244.3603 or 268.4124; or
(c) Is ordered by the appropriate governmental agency to correct
a violation of a building, safety or health code or regulation but fails
to correct the violation.
3. The Division shall maintain a log of any complaints that it
receives relating to activities for which the Division may revoke the
license to operate a facility for the dependent pursuant to subsection
2. The Division shall provide to a facility for the care of adults
during the day:
(a) A summary of a complaint against the facility if the
investigation of the complaint by the Division either substantiates
the complaint or is inconclusive;
(b) A report of any investigation conducted with respect to the
complaint; and
(c) A report of any disciplinary action taken against the facility.
 The facility shall make the information available to the public
pursuant to NRS 449.2486.
4. On or before February 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Division shall submit to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau a written report setting forth, for the previous biennium:
-
*AB349*

– 9 –
(a) Any complaints included in the log maintained by the
Division pursuant to subsection 3; and
(b) Any disciplinary actions taken by the Division pursuant to
subsection 2.
Sec. 15. NRS 449.163 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.163 1. In addition to the payment of the amount required
by NRS 449.0308, if a medical facility, facility for the dependent or
facility which is required by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed violates any provision
related to its licensure, including any provision of NRS 439B.400,
439B.410 or 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, or any condition,
standard or regulation adopted by the Board, the Division, in
accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 449.165,
may:
(a) Prohibit the facility from admitting any patient until it
determines that the facility has corrected the violation;
(b) Limit the occupancy of the facility to the number of beds
occupied when the violation occurred, until it determines that the
facility has corrected the violation;
(c) If the license of the facility limits the occupancy of the
facility and the facility has exceeded the approved occupancy,
require the facility, at its own expense, to move patients to another
facility that is licensed;
(d) Except where a greater penalty is authorized by subsection 2,
impose an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000 per day
for each violation, together with interest thereon at a rate not to
exceed 10 percent per annum; and
(e) Appoint temporary management to oversee the operation of
the facility and to ensure the health and safety of the patients of the
facility, until:
(1) It determines that the facility has corrected the violation
and has management which is capable of ensuring continued
compliance with the applicable statutes, conditions, standards and
regulations; or
(2) Improvements are made to correct the violation.
2. If an off-campus location of a hospital fails to obtain a
national provider identifier that is distinct from the national provider
identifier used by the main campus and any other off-campus
location of the hospital in violation of NRS 449.1818, the Division
may impose against the hospital an administrative penalty of not
more than $10,000 for each day of such failure, together with
interest thereon at a rate not to exceed 10 percent per annum, in
addition to any other action authorized by this chapter.
-
*AB349*

– 10 –
3. If the facility fails to pay any administrative penalty imposed
pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 or subsection 2, the
Division may:
(a) Suspend the license of the facility until the administrative
penalty is paid; and
(b) Collect court costs, reasonable attorney’s fees and other
costs incurred to collect the administrative penalty.
4. The Division may require any facility that violates any
provision of NRS 439B.400, 439B.410 or 449.029 to 449.2428,
inclusive, or any condition, standard or regulation adopted by the
Board to make any improvements necessary to correct the violation.
5. Any money collected as administrative penalties pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 or subsection 2 must be accounted for
separately and used to administer and carry out the provisions of
NRS 449.001 to 449.430, inclusive, 449.435 to 449.531, inclusive,
and chapter 449A of NRS to protect the health, safety, well-being
and property of the patients and residents of facilities in accordance
with applicable state and federal standards or for any other purpose
authorized by the Legislature.
Sec. 16. NRS 450.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450.410 1. Supervising boards of county hospitals may:
(a) Provide for treatment to sick or injured persons and require
the payment of reasonable charges therefor.
(b) Contract for the provision of such treatment on a periodic
prepaid basis with any person authorized by the Commissioner of
Insurance pursuant to title 57 of NRS to arrange for or provide
health care services on a periodic prepaid basis.
 The treatment of such persons must not be permitted to interfere
with the treatment of purely charitable cases.
2. [Every] Except where different rates are required by
section 5 of this act, every person treated by a county hospital and
required to pay charges for hospitalization, shall pay the charges
fixed by the supervising board therefor . [,which] Any charges [,]
for hospitalization, when paid, must be paid forthwith into the
county treasury and deposited to the credit of the hospital fund.
3. Every person treated by a county hospital and required to
pay charges to the hospital has the right to the services of a
physician or surgeon of the person’s own choice, and has the right to
employ such special nurses as may be necessary, but the cost of the
physician, surgeon or nurses must not become a claim against the
county.
4. Supervising boards shall fix and determine reasonable
charges to be paid by sick and injured persons treated by county
hospitals, which charges must include the board and lodging of the
-
*AB349*

– 11 –
person and the customary use of hospital facilities by the person
admitted.
Sec. 17. NRS 687B.409 is hereby amended to read as follows:
687B.409 1. Every payment made pursuant to a policy of
health insurance to pay for treatment relating solely to mental health
or an alcohol or substance use disorder must be made directly to the
provider of health care that provides the treatment if the provider:
(a) Is an out-of-network provider; and
(b) Has obtained and delivered to the insurer or an authorized
representative of the insurer, including, without limitation, a third-
party administrator, a written assignment of benefits pursuant to
which the insured has assigned to the provider the insured’s benefits
under the policy of health insurance with regard to the treatment.
2. An out-of-network provider that receives payment pursuant
to subsection 1:
(a) Shall, if a person paid the provider directly for the treatment
described in subsection 1, refund to the person the amount that the
person paid directly to the provider for the treatment, less any
applicable deductible, copayment or coinsurance, not later than 45
days after the provider receives payment pursuant to subsection 1;
and
(b) Must indemnify and hold harmless the insurer against any
claim made against the insurer by the person who receives the
treatment described in subsection 1 for any amount paid by the
insurer to the provider in compliance with this section.
3. An assignment of benefits described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 is irrevocable for the period:
(a) Beginning on the date the insured gives to the out-of-
network provider the assignment of benefits; and
(b) Ending on the later of:
(1) The date on which the out-of-network provider receives
from the insurer the final payment for the treatment; or
(2) The date of the final resolution, including, without
limitation, by settlement or trial, of all claims relating to all
payments which relate to the treatment.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an
insurer to make a payment to an out-of-network provider:
(a) Who is not authorized by law to provide the treatment;
(b) Who provides the treatment in violation of any law; or
(c) In an amount which exceeds the amount required by the
policy of health insurance to be paid for out-of-network treatment.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Health care services” means services for the diagnosis,
prevention, treatment, care or relief of a health condition, illness,
injury or disease.
-
*AB349*

– 12 –
(b) “Insured” means a person who receives benefits pursuant to
a policy of health insurance.
(c) “Insurer” means a person, including, without limitation, a
governmental entity, who issues or otherwise provides a policy of
health insurance.
(d) “Network plan” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 689B.570.
(e) “Out-of-network provider” means a provider of health care
who:
(1) Provides health care services;
(2) Is paid, pursuant to a policy of health insurance, for
providing the health care services; and
(3) Is not under contract to provide the health care services as
part of any network plan associated with the policy of health
insurance.
(f) “Policy of health insurance” includes, without limitation, a
policy, contract, certificate, plan or agreement, as applicable, issued
pursuant to or otherwise governed by NRS 287.0402 to 287.049,
inclusive, and sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act or chapter 608,
689A, 689B, 689C, 695A, 695B, 695C, 695F or 695G of NRS for
the provision of, delivery of, arrangement for, payment for or
reimbursement for any of the costs of health care services.
(g) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.070.
Sec. 18. NRS 689B.065 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689B.065 1. A policy of group health insurance issued to
replace any discontinued policy or coverage for group health
insurance must:
(a) Provide coverage for all persons who were covered under the
previous policy or coverage on the date it was discontinued; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, provide
benefits which are at least as extensive as the benefits provided by
the previous policy or coverage, except that benefits may be reduced
or excluded to the extent that such a reduction or exclusion was
permissible under the terms of the previous policy or coverage,
 if that replacement policy is issued within 60 days after the date
on which the previous policy or coverage was discontinued.
2. If an employer obtains a replacement policy pursuant to
subsection 1 to cover the employees of the employer, any benefits
provided by the previous policy or coverage may be reduced if
notice of the reduction is given to the employees of the employer
pursuant to NRS 608.1577.
3. Any insurer which issues a replacement policy pursuant to
subsection 1 may submit a written request to the insurer who
provided the previous policy or coverage for a statement of benefits
-
*AB349*

– 13 –
which were provided under that policy or coverage. Upon receiving
such a request, the insurer who provided the previous policy or
coverage shall give a written statement to the insurer providing the
replacement policy which indicates what benefits were provided and
what exclusions or reductions were in effect under the previous
policy or coverage.
4. The provisions of this section:
(a) Apply to a self-insured employer who provides health
benefits to the employees of the employer and replaces those
benefits with a policy of group health insurance.
(b) Do not apply to the Public Employees’ Benefits Program
established pursuant to NRS 287.0402 to 287.049, inclusive [.] , and
sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 19. 1. The Board of the Public Employees’ Benefits
Program and an opt-in local government shall take into account the
change in the rates of reimbursement provided for the services of
health care facilities resulting from the provisions of section 5 of
this act when assessing the cost of premiums or contributions for the
Program or the plan of health insurance offered by the opt-in local
government, as applicable.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Health care facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 4 of this act.
(b) “Opt-in local government” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 5 of this act.
Sec. 20. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 21. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 22. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 21 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB349*